Missouri, session 2026, HB2389.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 640, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 640.870, to read as follows:
640.870. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of natural resources;
(2) "Weather modification", any activity performed with the intention of
producing artificial changes to the composition, behavior, or dynamics of the
atmosphere including, but not limited to:
(a) Dispersing substances into the air that serve as cloud condensation or ice
nuclei, which alter the microphysical process within the cloud;
(b) Dropping pollution or biological agents from any form of aircraft designed to
alter the earth's atmosphere, manipulate the environment, or cause harm to the food
supply; or
(c) The use of cloud seeding, meaning directing rainfall to a specific location by a
process of injecting, releasing, or dispersing chemicals into the atmosphere.
2. It shall be unlawful to use any form of weather modification in the state.
3. Any individual may report violations of this section to the department. The
department shall create an online publicly accessible form for reporting weather
modification under this section. The department shall create procedures to investigate
every such report to determine whether weather modification occurred.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2389 2
4. If the department finds that weather modification occurred, the department
shall commence a civil action in the court of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds
that a violation occurred, the court may grant damages, injunctive relief, attorney's fees,
and any such other relief the court finds appropriate.
5. The department shall report any known instance of weather modification to
the administrator of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration pursuant to
15 CFR Section 908.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the use of pesticides on
any farming or ranching operation in the state.
7. The department may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔